Hawaii, session 2026, HB1728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that limited water infrastructure is a major barrier to new housing and sustainable land use in the State.  Many properties, whether connected or not to county water systems, face restrictions that prevent efficient water use or new development. Rainwater catchment systems offer a low-cost, sustainable way to supplement water supply for potable and nonpotable uses.  The legislature further finds that allowing these systems across all zoning types can reduce strain on public infrastructure, support local self-sufficiency, and encourage responsible water management. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of health to allow for the installation and operation of rainwater catchment systems for potable and nonpotable uses on all properties; and (2)  Require the department of health to regulate and enforce standards for the use of rainwater catchment systems. SECTION 2.  Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-     Regulation of rainwater catchment systems.  (a)  The department of health shall permit the installation and operation of rainwater catchment systems for potable and nonpotable uses on all properties, regardless of whether the property is connected to a county water system. (b) The department of health shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for the regulation and enforcement of rainwater catchment systems, which include safety, maintenance, design, and backflow prevention standards to prevent contamination of any public, county, or private water source.  In adopting rules, the department shall consult, and may adopt by reference, the most current edition of the: (1)  American Rainwater Catchment Systems Association/American Society of Plumbing Engineers/American National Standards Institute (ARCSA/ASPE/ANSI) 63: Rainwater Catchment Systems, as published jointly by the American Rainwater Catchment Systems Association and American Society of Plumbing Engineers, which establishes minimum design, installation, and safety standards for rainwater catchment systems; and (2)  American Society for Sanitary Engineering/American Rainwater Catchment Systems Association/International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials/American National Standards Institute (ASSE/ARCSA/IAPMO/ANSI) Series 21000: Professional Qualifications Standard for Rainwater Catchment Systems Personnel, as published jointly by the American Society for Sanitary Engineering International, American Rainwater Catchment Systems Association, and International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, which establishes uniform minimum qualifications for designers, installers, and inspectors of rainwater catchment systems. (c)  The department of health may require registration, inspection, or notification of rainwater catchment systems where necessary to protect public health or water quality but shall not unreasonably restrict or prohibit their use. (d)  As used in this section: "County water system" means any public water infrastructure operated or regulated by a department or board of water supply of the county. "Rainwater catchment system" means a system designed to collect and store rainwater from rooftops or other surfaces for potable and nonpotable use, including irrigation, toilet flushing, cleaning, and landscape watering." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.